Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FARM TO SCHOOL AND EARLY CARE PROGRAMS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for providing more fruits, vegetables, meat, poultry, grain, and dairy for children in schools and early childhood education settings, including, at the commissioner's discretion, providing grants to reimburse schools and early childhood education and child care providers for purchasing equipment and agricultural products. Organizations must participate in the National School Lunch Program or the Child and Adult Care Food Program to be eligible. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated, $150,000 each year is for a statewide coordinator of farm-to-institution strategy and programming. The coordinator must consult with relevant stakeholders and provide technical assistance and training for participating farmers and institutions, including eligible grant recipients. new text end new text begin (c) At the commissioner's discretion, for state administration of federal cooperative agreements for purchasing Minnesota grown and raised foods for schools, child care providers, food banks, and other institutions, the commissioner may use an amount of state funds equal to no more than 7.5 percent of the total federal funds awarded to the state. The commissioner shall expend any available federal administrative funds awarded for this purpose before using state funds. new text end new text begin (d) The appropriation under this section is made under the agricultural growth, research, and innovation program in Minnesota Statutes, section 41A.12. new text end